Hawaii statutes.
§660-14 For person of unknown name.
The person to be produced shall be designated by the person's name, if known,
and if that is not known or is uncertain, the person may be designated in any
other manner, so that it can be known who is the person intended. [L 1870, c
32, §10; RL 1925, §2737; RL 1935, §4322; RL 1945, §10363; RL 1955, §239-14; HRS
§660-14; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next